Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202684-1208
Administrator; preservation duplicates of essential records; process used; exception.

(1) The administrator may make or cause to be made preservation duplicates of essential records or may designate as preservation duplicates existing copies thereof. A preservation duplicate shall be durable, accurate, complete, and clear and, if made by means of photography, microphotography, photocopying, film, microfilm, optical imagery, or similar processes using an accessible durable medium, shall be prepared in conformity to standards prescribed and approved by the board.

(2) A preservation duplicate made by a photographic, photostatic, microfilm, microcard, miniature photographic, optical imagery, or similar process which accurately reproduces or forms an accessible durable medium for so reproducing the original shall have the same force and effect for all purposes as the original record, whether the original is in existence or not. A transcript, exemplification, or certified copy of such preservation duplicate shall for all purposes be deemed a transcript, exemplification, or certified copy of the original record.

(3) No copy of an essential record shall be used as a preservation duplicate unless, under the general laws of the state, the copy has the same force and effect for all purposes as the original record.

(4) A medium is accessible if it is able to be retrieved through intellectual, digital, or physical means within institutional or legal parameters.

Laws 1961, c. 455, § 8, p. 1390;

Laws 1991, LB 25, § 3;

Laws 2026, LB596, § 14.
July 18, 2026